District of Columbia statutes.
2-1381

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Advisory Committee” means the Advisory Committee to the Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs.

(1A)

“Fund” means the LGBTQ Homeless Youth Training Grant Fund established in § 2-1384.

(2)

Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and questioning” or “LGBTQ” means individuals who identify themselves as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender or are questioning or exploring their sexuality or sexual identity, or are concerned about applying a social label to themselves related to their sexuality or sexual identity and who are residents of the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Office” means the Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs established in § 2-1382.

History

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-89, § 2, 53 DCR 1084
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 122(a), 53 DCR 6794
May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-100, § 3(a), 61 DCR 1873
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1022(a), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (1), validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-100 added (1A).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs” for “Office of Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual, and Transgender Affairs” in (1) and (3); and rewrote (2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1022(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).